chuvash.xfst
# Vowels
define V [ a | e | i | o | u | y | ɯ | æ ];
define BackV [ a | o | u | ɯ ];
define C [ l | t | m | s | r | g ];
define eC1 [ g ];
define eC2 [ l ];

read lexc protoTurkic.lexc
define Lexicon;

# vowel swapping
define aMarching1 [..] -> a || i _ C C a ;

# s to ʃ
define sTosh s -> ʃ || _ i ;

# marched a reduction
define aMarching2 a -> ɯ|| i a C C _ ;

# vowel swapping deletion
define aMarching3 i -> 0 || _ V ;

# d lenition
define dLenition d -> ð || V _ V ;

# break coda clusters
define CCtoCVC [..] -> ɯ|| eC1 _ eC2 ;

# g to ɯ after consonants at end of word
define gVocalism [ g | k ] -> ɯ || C _ .#. ;

# g deletion after consonants before vowels
define gDeletion g -> 0 || C _ V ;

# g lenition
define gLenition g -> w ;

# b lenition
define bLenition b -> w || V _ ;

# b fortition
define bFortition b -> p ;

# g&q backing
define gBacking g -> ʁ|| BackV _ ;
define qBacking k -> q|| BackV _ ;
define qBacking2 k -> q|| _ BackV ;
define qLenition q -> x|| _ ;

# s to r
define sTor s -> r || V _ [ V | .#. ] ;

# ð to r
define dhTor ð -> r ;

# Devoice the palatal fricative
define DevoiceJ ʝ -> ɕ ;

# ŋ merges with n
define Mergeŋ ŋ -> n ;

# Round n
define RoundN n -> m || [ u | o ] _ ;

# Shorten vowels
define ShortenV1 u -> ʊ ;
define ShortenV2 y -> ʉ ;
define ShortenV3 i -> ɘ ;
define ShortenV4 ɯ -> ə ;
define ShortenV5 o -> ʊ || [ C | .#. ] _ C ;
define ShortenV6 e -> ɘ || [ C | .#. ] _ C ;

# a→u
define AtoU a -> u ;

# e→a
define EtoA e -> a ;

#fix harmony for ӗ
define FixVHFront ɘ -> ə || [ a ] C _ ;

#fix harmony for ӑ
define FixVHBack ə -> ɘ || [ ɘ | ʉ ] C _ ;


# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

# Convert to Cyrillic
define MapToCyrillic [ a e u y i ɯ ʉ ɘ ʊ ə | а е у ӳ и ы ӗ ӗ ӑ ӑ ] ;
define CyrlV0 a -> а ;
define CyrlV1 e -> е ;
define CyrlV2 u -> у ;
define CyrlV3 y -> ӳ ;
define CyrlV4 i -> и ;
define CyrlV5 ɯ -> ы ;
define CyrlV6 ʉ -> ӗ ;
define CyrlV7 ɘ -> ӗ ;
define CyrlV8 ʊ -> ӑ ;
define CyrlV9 ə -> ӑ ;

define CyrlC0 r -> р ;
define CyrlC1 k -> к ;
define CyrlC2 p -> п ;
define CyrlC3 w -> в ;
define CyrlC4 s -> с ;
define CyrlC5 ɕ -> ҫ ;
define CyrlC6 ʃ -> ш ;
define CyrlC7 t -> т ;
define CyrlC8 l -> л ;
define CyrlC9 m -> м ;
define CyrlCA n -> н ;
define CyrlCB j -> й ;
define CyrlCC x -> х ;

# the docs say to do this twice, but it seems weird
#read lexc protoTurkic.lexc
#define Lexcion

define Grammar Lexicon .o.
               aMarching1 .o.
               sTosh .o.
               aMarching2 .o.
               aMarching3 .o.
               dLenition .o.
               CCtoCVC .o.
               gVocalism .o.
               gDeletion .o.
               gLenition .o.
               bLenition .o.
               bFortition .o.
               gBacking .o.
               qBacking .o. qBacking2 .o.
               qLenition .o.
               sTor .o.
               dhTor .o.
               DevoiceJ .o.
               Mergeŋ .o.
               RoundN .o.
               ShortenV1 .o. ShortenV2 .o. ShortenV3 .o. ShortenV4 .o. ShortenV5 .o. #ShortenV6 .o.
					AtoU .o.
               EtoA .o.
               FixVHFront .o. FixVHBack .o.
               CyrlV0 .o. CyrlV1 .o. CyrlV2 .o. CyrlV3 .o. CyrlV4 .o. CyrlV5 .o. CyrlV6 .o. CyrlV7 .o. CyrlV8 .o. CyrlV9 .o.
               CyrlC0 .o. CyrlC1 .o. CyrlC2 .o. CyrlC3 .o. CyrlC4 .o. CyrlC5 .o. CyrlC6 .o. CyrlC7 .o. CyrlC8 .o. CyrlC9 .o. CyrlCA .o. CyrlCB .o. CyrlCC .o.
               Cleanup ;

regex Grammar ;

#regex Grammar .P. MapToCyrillic ;


save stack chuvash.hfst
